Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-512.08
Intervention in matters relating to child, spousal, or medical support; when authorized.

The county attorney or authorized attorney, acting for or on behalf of the State of Nebraska, may intervene without leave of the court in any proceeding for dissolution of marriage, paternity, separate maintenance, or child, spousal, or medical support for the purpose of securing an order for child, spousal, or medical support, modifying an order for child or medical support, or modifying an order for child support as the result of a review of such order under sections 43-512.12 to 43-512.18. Such proceedings shall be limited only to the determination of child or medical support. Except in cases in which the intervention is the result of a review under such sections, the county attorney or authorized attorney shall so act only when it appears that the children are not otherwise represented by counsel.

Laws 1976, LB 926, § 10;

Laws 1985, Second Spec. Sess., LB 7, § 72;

Laws 1991, LB 457, § 12;

Laws 1991, LB 715, § 11;

Laws 1994, LB 1224, § 54;

Laws 2007, LB554, § 41.

The district court did not err in permitting the State to intervene as of right in a proceeding for the modification of a bridge order where there was no dispute that the juvenile court's amended bridge order and the district court's order of modification determined paternity, and under section 43-246.02(1)(b), a bridge order can only be entered by the juvenile court once a determination of paternity has been legally established. Jones v. Colgrove, 319 Neb. 461, 24 N.W.3d 1 (2025).